District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.74

Fares; structure; purpose.

(a)

The Department shall set the rates and fares for the DC Streetcar.

(b)

Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall prevent the Department from offering tickets at no cost or at discounted prices as part of the Department’s marketing of the DC Streetcar.

(c)

The Department shall provide quality service at reasonable fares.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11p
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-921.73.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.